Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.080

Transfer of powers and duties from the department of social and health services.

The powers and duties of the department of social and health services and the secretary of social and health services under the following statutes are hereby transferred to the department of health and the secretary of health: Chapters 16.70, 18.46, 18.71, 18.73, 18.76, 69.30, 70.28, 70.30, 70.50, *70.58, 70.62, 70.83, 70.90, 70A.388, 70.104, 70A.100, 70A.105, 70A.120, 70A.125, 70A.310, 70.127, 70A.130, and 80.50 RCW. More specifically, the following programs and services presently administered by the department of social and health services are hereby transferred to the department of health:

(1) Personal health and protection programs and related management and support services, including, but not limited to: Immunizations; tuberculosis; sexually transmitted diseases; AIDS; diabetes control; primary health care; cardiovascular risk reduction; kidney disease; regional genetic services; newborn metabolic screening; sentinel birth defects; cytogenetics; communicable disease epidemiology; and chronic disease epidemiology;

(2) Environmental health protection services and related management and support services, including, but not limited to: Radiation, including X-ray control, radioactive materials, uranium mills, low-level waste, emergency response and reactor safety, and environmental radiation protection; drinking water; toxic substances; on-site sewage; recreational water contact facilities; food services sanitation; shellfish; and general environmental health services, including schools, vectors, parks, and camps;

(3) Public health laboratory;

(4) Public health support services, including, but not limited to: Vital records; health data; local public health services support; and health education and information;

(5) Licensing and certification services including, but not limited to: Behavioral health agencies, agencies providing problem and pathological gambling treatment, health and personal care facility survey, construction review, emergency medical services, laboratory quality assurance, and accommodations surveys; and

(6) Effective January 1, 1991, parent and child health services and related management support services, including, but not limited to: Maternal and infant health; child health; parental health; nutrition; services for children with disabilities; family planning; adolescent pregnancy services; high priority infant tracking; early intervention; parenting education; prenatal regionalization; and power and duties under RCW 43.20A.635. The director of the office of financial management may recommend to the legislature a delay in this transfer, if it is determined that this time frame is not adequate.

[ 2021 c 65 s 44; 2018 c 201 s 8009; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 201.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 70.58 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2019 c 148 s 40, effective January 1, 2021. For later enactment, see chapter 70.58A RCW.

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 201: See notes following RCW 41.05.018.